Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.160 and 2023 c 295 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is determined according to RCW 13.40.0357 and this section.(a) When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard ranges, except as provided in subsections (2)((, (3), (4),))through (5)((, or (6))) of this section. The disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.(b) When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding ((thirty))30 days, commitment shall be to the department for the standard range of confinement, except as provided in subsections (2)((, (3), (4),))through (5)((, or (6))) of this section for child molestation in the first degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.083 and for hit and run resulting in death offenses under RCW 46.52.020(4)(a) and for rape of a child in the second degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.076 and for rape in the second or third degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.060 and for offenses listed in RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v).(c) Except for child molestation in the first degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.083 and hit and run resulting in death offenses under RCW 46.52.020(4)(a) and rape of the child in the second degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.076 and rape in the second or third degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.060 and offenses listed in RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v), before the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding 30 days, the court shall make an independent finding, supported by clear and convincing evidence, that commitment to the department is needed because a community-based placement would not adequately protect the community. A stipulation by the parties alone is not sufficient to support an independent finding that commitment to the department is needed under this subsection. Commitment of a juvenile to confinement over 30 days must be to the department for the standard range of confinement, except as provided in this subsection and subsections (2) through (5) of this section.(d) In making a finding under (c) of this subsection, the court shall consider the following factors:(i) The severity of the offense or offenses for which the juvenile has most recently been adjudicated, including the juvenile's role in the offense, the juvenile's behavior, and harm done to victims;(ii) The juvenile's criminal history, including the adequacy and success of previous attempts by the juvenile court to rehabilitate the juvenile;(iii) Whether the programming, treatment, and education offered and provided in a juvenile rehabilitation facility is appropriate to meet the treatment and security needs of the juvenile;(iv) Whether the goals of rehabilitation and community safety can be met by assigning the juvenile to a less restrictive disposition that is available to the court; and(v) The juvenile's age, developmental maturity, mental and emotional health, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, and any disabilities or special needs impacting the safety or suitability of committing the juvenile to a term of confinement in juvenile court.(e) If the court does not make a finding under (c) of this subsection that commitment to the department is needed, the court may impose one or more local sanctions, in addition to a determinate sentence of electronic monitoring for up to the minimum of the juvenile's standard range while on community supervision. The court may also impose a suspended disposition.(f) If the court does make a finding under (c) of this subsection, the court must maintain concurrent jurisdiction with the department over the juvenile, except the court's concurrent jurisdiction may be only for the purposes of conducting the review hearings described under RCW 13.40.185(3), and any community supervision that is ordered if a juvenile is released at the review hearing.(g) If a juvenile is sentenced to a determinate sentence of electronic monitoring for up to the minimum of the juvenile's standard range under (e) of this subsection, and is found by the court to have violated any terms of an electronic monitoring agreement, the court may impose a sanction pursuant to RCW 13.40.200, or if the court makes a finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c), revoke the electronic monitoring and order confinement for up to the remainder of the determinate electronic monitoring sentence previously imposed. Upon completion of a sanction, the juvenile may resume electronic monitoring. Any time served in detention due to a violation of the terms of an electronic monitoring agreement shall be applied as credit for time served for the remaining time on electronic monitoring, or if revoked, confinement.(2) If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition within the standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported by clear and convincing evidence.A disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate, subject to RCW 13.40.185(3), and shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a combination thereof. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement exceeding ((thirty))30 days, the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A disposition outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the state or the respondent. A disposition ((within the standard range))with a term of confinement that is 30 days or less is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230. A disposition within the standard range for the offenses in subsection (1)(b) of this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230, but other dispositions, including revocations of suspended dispositions, with a term of confinement of more than 30 days are appealable under RCW 13.40.230.(3) If a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and has no history of a prior sex offense, the court may impose the special sex offender disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.162.(4) ((If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the))The court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.165 unless a juvenile has been adjudicated of a child molestation in the first degree offense under RCW 9A.44.083 or a hit and run resulting in death offense under RCW 46.52.020(4)(a) or a rape of a child in the second degree offense under RCW 9A.44.076 or a rape in the second or third degree offense under RCW 9A.44.050 or 9A.44.060 or an offense listed in RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v).(5) ((If a juvenile is subject to a commitment of 15 to 65 weeks of confinement, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.167.(6) When the offender is subject to a standard range commitment of 15 to 36 weeks and is ineligible for a suspended disposition alternative, a manifest injustice disposition below the standard range, special sex offender disposition alternative, chemical dependency disposition alternative, or mental health disposition alternative, the court in a county with a pilot program under RCW 13.40.169 may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.169.(7))) RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of possessing a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(v) or any crime in which a special finding is entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.(((8)))(6) RCW 13.40.308 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of theft of a motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.065, possession of a stolen motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.068, taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.070, and taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree under RCW 9A.56.075.(((9)))(7) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time served.(((10)))(8) Except as provided under subsections (3)((, (4),))through (5)((, or (6))) of this section, or option B of RCW 13.40.0357, or RCW 13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the execution of the disposition.(((11)))(9) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.Sec. 2. RCW 13.40.165 and 2023 c 449 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The purpose of this disposition alternative is to ensure that successful treatment options to reduce recidivism are available to eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 71.24.615. It is also the purpose of the disposition alternative to assure that minors in need of substance use disorder, mental health, and/or co-occurring disorder treatment receive an appropriate continuum of culturally relevant care and treatment, including prevention and early intervention, self-directed care, parent-directed care, and residential treatment. To facilitate the continuum of care and treatment to minors in out-of-home placements, all divisions of the department that provide these services to minors shall jointly plan and deliver these services. It is also the purpose of the disposition alternative to protect the rights of minors against needless hospitalization and deprivations of liberty and to enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs and in accordance with sound professional judgment. The mental health, substance abuse, and co-occurring disorder treatment providers shall, to the extent possible, offer services that involve minors' parents, guardians, and family.(2) The court must consider eligibility for the substance use disorder or mental health disposition alternative when a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition ((of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement)) and has not committed a child molestation in the first degree offense under RCW 9A.44.083 or a hit and run resulting in death offense under RCW 46.52.020(4)(a) or a rape of a child in the second degree offense under RCW 9A.44.076 or a rape in the second or third degree offense under RCW 9A.44.050 or 9A.44.060 or an ((A- or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50 RCW))offense under RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v). The court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically dependent, substance abusing, or has significant mental health or co-occurring disorders may order an examination by a substance use disorder counselor from a substance use disorder treatment facility approved under chapter 70.96A RCW or a mental health professional as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW to determine if the youth is chemically dependent, substance abusing, or suffers from significant mental health or co-occurring disorders. The state shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless third-party insurance coverage is available.(3) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment of drug-alcohol problems, mental health diagnoses, previous treatment attempts, the respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the examiner's information.(4) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a minimum:(a) Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;(b) Availability of appropriate treatment;(c) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;(d) Anticipated length of treatment; and(e) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.(5) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state or the respondent shall order, a second examination. The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender, in which case the state shall pay the cost if no third-party insurance coverage is available.(6)(a) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from use of this disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section.(b) If the court determines that this disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose the standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that such disposition would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition above the standard range as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357 if the disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement of the offender does not exceed a maximum of 52 weeks, suspend execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court shall require the offender to undergo available outpatient drug/alcohol, mental health, or co-occurring disorder treatment and/or inpatient mental health or drug/alcohol treatment. The court shall only order inpatient treatment under this section if a funded bed is available. If the inpatient treatment is longer than 90 days, the court shall hold a review hearing every 30 days beyond the initial 90 days. The respondent may appear telephonically at these review hearings if in compliance with treatment. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court may impose conditions of community supervision and other sanctions, including up to 30 days of confinement, 150 hours of community restitution, and payment of restitution.(7) The mental health/co-occurring disorder/drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers appropriate.If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or, if the court makes a finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c), revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is being revoked.(8) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the offense charged. "Victim" may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child or is not a minor child but is incapacitated, incompetent, disabled, or deceased.(9) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time served.(10) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.(11) A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230, unless the court revokes the suspended disposition and makes a finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c).(12) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the costs incurred by the juvenile courts for the mental health, substance use disorder, and/or co-occurring disorder evaluations, treatment, and costs of supervision required under this section shall be paid by the health care authority.(13) A juvenile, or the parent, guardian, or other person having custody of the juvenile shall not be required to pay the cost of any evaluation or treatment ordered under this section.Sec. 3. RCW 13.40.185 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 608 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Any))Except as provided under RCW 13.40.160(1)(e), any term of confinement imposed for an offense which exceeds ((thirty))30 days shall be served under the supervision of the department, although the juvenile court maintains concurrent jurisdiction with the department over the juvenile, only for the purposes of conducting review hearings described under this section and any community supervision that is ordered if a juvenile is released at the review hearing. If the period of confinement imposed for more than one offense exceeds ((thirty))30 days but the term imposed for each offense is less than ((thirty))30 days or if the court orders electronic monitoring up to the minimum of the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(1)(e), the confinement may, in the discretion of the court, be served in a juvenile facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state or a county.(a) The juvenile court administrator and the secretary of the department, or the secretary's designee, in alignment with the definition of confinement in RCW 13.40.020(7), shall prioritize capacity-related concerns related to the physical custody of the juvenile when establishing contractual agreements in efforts to provide a humane, safe, and rehabilitative environment.(b) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish contractual agreements with at least four juvenile court administrators, including at least one that is located east of the Cascade mountains, for the physical custody of young people with terms of confinement where there are less than 90 days before the release date set in accordance with RCW 13.40.210(1). The department must negotiate the contractual agreements required under this subsection with each county interested in providing for physical custody of young people as described under this subsection. Counties are not required to provide for the physical custody of young people as described under this subsection under existing contracts.(2) Whenever a juvenile is confined in a detention facility or is committed to the department, the court may not directly order a juvenile into a particular county or state facility. The juvenile court administrator and the secretary or the secretary's designee, as appropriate, has the sole discretion to determine in which facility a juvenile should be confined or committed. The counties may operate a variety of detention facilities as determined by the county legislative authority subject to available funds.(3) Excluding child molestation in the first degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.083 and hit and run resulting in death offenses under RCW 46.52.020(4)(a) and rape of a child in the second degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.076 and rape in the second or third degree offenses under RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.060 and the offenses listed in RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v), the juvenile court maintains concurrent jurisdiction with the department over a juvenile who is committed to the department, except the court's concurrent jurisdiction may be only for the purposes of scheduling and conducting a review hearing at the mid-point of the minimum range, provided the review does not occur until after the juvenile has served at least four months in the custody of the department, and imposing any community supervision that is ordered if a juvenile is released at the review hearing. The court may schedule additional review hearings at its discretion.(a) The department shall provide a report to the juvenile court at least 14 days before each review hearing detailing:(i) The services received by the juvenile;(ii) Any infractions committed by the juvenile;(iii) How often the juvenile and the juvenile's family have had in-person visitation and video visits since the disposition hearing or the last review hearing, whichever is later; and(iv) How often the juvenile has been under room confinement due to staffing issues or overpopulation and whether there have been any major disruptions to programming in the three months preceding the review hearing.(b) During each review hearing the court shall consider the juvenile's progress and, unless the court makes a finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c), shall release the juvenile from the custody of the department and place the juvenile on up to a year of community supervision administered by the county, unless the juvenile will be placed on mandatory parole, in which case the juvenile shall be released to parole rather than community supervision.(c) The prosecutor shall provide notice to the victim at least two weeks before each review hearing described under subsection (3) of this section, if the victim requests such notice be provided.(d) The respondent shall appear remotely for the hearing described under subsection (3) of this section, unless ordered by the court to appear in person.Sec. 4. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2023 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORYjuveniledispositionoffensecategorydescription (rcw citation)juvenile dispositioncategory forattempt, bailjump,conspiracy, orsolicitationÂ Arson and Malicious MischiefÂ AArson 1 (9A.48.020)B+Â BArson 2 (9A.48.030)CÂ CReckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040)DÂ DReckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050)EÂ BMalicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070)CÂ CMalicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080)DÂ DMalicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus (9.40.100)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105)EÂ APossession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)B+Â Â Assault and Other Crimes Involving Physical HarmÂ Â AAssault 1 (9A.36.011)B+Â B+Assault 2 (9A.36.021)C+Â C+Assault 3 (9A.36.031)D+Â D+Assault 4 (9A.36.041)EÂ B+Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 15 or underC+Â A++Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 16 or 17AÂ D+Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050)EÂ C+Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060)D+Â D+Coercion (9A.36.070)EÂ C+Custodial Assault (9A.36.100)D+Â Â Burglary and TrespassÂ Â B+Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed atage 15 or underC+Â A-Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed atage 16 or 17B+Â BResidential Burglary (9A.52.025)CÂ BBurglary 2 (9A.52.030)CÂ DBurglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060)EÂ DCriminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070)EÂ ECriminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080)EÂ CMineral Trespass (78.44.330)CÂ CVehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095)DÂ DVehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100)EÂ Â DrugsÂ Â EPossession/Consumption of Alcohol (66.44.270)EÂ CIllegally Obtaining Legend Drug (69.41.020)DÂ C+Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a))D+Â EPossession of LegendDrug (69.41.030(2)(b))EÂ B+Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or (b))B+Â CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c))CÂ EPossession of Cannabis <40 grams (69.50.4014)EÂ CFraudulently Obtaining Controlled Substance (69.50.403)CÂ C+Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit (69.50.410)C+Â EUnlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020)EÂ BViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b))BÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e))CÂ EViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4013)EÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4012)CÂ Â Firearms and WeaponsÂ Â BTheft of Firearm (9A.56.300)CÂ BPossession of Stolen Firearm(9A.56.310)CÂ ECarrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit (9.41.050)EÂ CPossession of Firearms by Minor (<18) (9.41.040(2)(a) (v))CÂ D+Possession of Dangerous Weapon (9.41.250)EÂ DIntimidating Another Person by use of Weapon (9.41.270)EÂ Â HomicideÂ Â A+Murder 1 (9A.32.030)AÂ A+Murder 2 (9A.32.050)B+Â B+Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060)C+Â C+Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070)D+Â B+Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520)C+Â Â KidnappingÂ Â AKidnap 1 (9A.40.020)B+Â B+Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030)C+Â C+Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)D+Â Â Obstructing Governmental OperationÂ Â DObstructing a Law Enforcement Officer (9A.76.020)EÂ EResisting Arrest (9A.76.040)EÂ BIntroducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140)CÂ CIntroducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150)DÂ EIntroducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160)EÂ B+Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180)C+Â B+Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)C+Â Â Public DisturbanceÂ Â C+Criminal Mischief with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b))D+Â D+Criminal Mischief Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a))EÂ EFailure to Disperse (9A.84.020)EÂ EDisorderly Conduct (9A.84.030)EÂ Â Sex CrimesÂ Â ARape 1 (9A.44.040)B+Â B++Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 15 through age 17B+Â C+Rape 3 (9A.44.060)D+Â B++Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)committed at age 15B+Â B+Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076)C+Â BIncest 1 (9A.64.020(1))CÂ CIncest 2 (9A.64.020(2))DÂ D+Indecent Exposure (Victim <14) (9A.88.010)EÂ EIndecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010)EÂ B+Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070)C+Â C+Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080)D+Â EO & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030)EÂ B+Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100)C+Â B++Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 15 through age 17B+Â BChild Molestation 2 (9A.44.086)C+Â CFailure to Register as a Sex Offender (9A.44.132)DÂ Â Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and ForgeryÂ Â BTheft 1 (9A.56.030)CÂ CTheft 2 (9A.56.040)DÂ DTheft 3 (9A.56.050)EÂ BTheft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and 9A.56.083)CÂ CForgery (9A.60.020)DÂ ARobbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed atage 15 or underB+Â A++Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed atage 16 or 17AÂ B+Robbery 2 (9A.56.210)C+Â B+Extortion 1 (9A.56.120)C+Â C+Extortion 2 (9A.56.130)D+Â CIdentity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2))DÂ DIdentity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3))EÂ DImproperly Obtaining Financial Information (9.35.010)EÂ BPossession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068)CÂ BPossession of Stolen Property 1 (9A.56.150)CÂ CPossession of Stolen Property 2 (9A.56.160)DÂ DPossession of Stolen Property 3 (9A.56.170)EÂ BTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (9A.56.070)CÂ CTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (9A.56.075)DÂ BTheft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065)CÂ Â Motor Vehicle Related CrimesÂ Â EDriving Without a License (46.20.005)EÂ B+Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a))C+Â CHit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b))DÂ DHit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5))EÂ EHit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010)EÂ CVehicular Assault (46.61.522)DÂ CAttempting to Elude Pursuing Police Vehicle (46.61.024)DÂ EReckless Driving (46.61.500)EÂ DDriving While Under the Influence (46.61.502 and 46.61.504)EÂ B+Felony Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502(6))BÂ B+Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))BÂ Â OtherÂ Â BAnimal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205)CÂ BBomb Threat (9.61.160)CÂ CEscape 11 (9A.76.110)CÂ CEscape 21 (9A.76.120)CÂ DEscape 3 (9A.76.130)EÂ EObscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls (9.61.230)EÂ AOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class A FelonyB+Â BOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class B FelonyCÂ COther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class C FelonyDÂ DOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross MisdemeanorEÂ EOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult MisdemeanorEÂ VViolation of Order of Restitution, Community Supervision, or Confinement (13.40.200)2 V1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 28 days confinement2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDSThis schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing option A, B, C, or D based on a court's finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c).Â Â OPTION AJUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRIDSTANDARD RANGEÂ A++129 to 260 weeks for all category A++ offensesÂ A+180 weeks to age 21 for all category A+ offensesÂ A103-129 weeks for all category A offensesÂ A-30-40 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksÂ B++15-36 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksCURRENTB+15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeksOFFENSEBLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeksCATEGORYC+LSLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeksÂ CLSLSLSLS15-36 weeksÂ D+LSLSLSLSLSÂ DLSLSLSLSLSÂ ELSLSLSLSLSPRIOR01234 or moreADJUDICATIONSÂ Â Â NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement. "LS" means "local sanctions" as defined in RCW 13.40.020.(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense category.(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.OROPTION BSUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this subsection:(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population; and(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option under this section if the offender is adjudicated of((:(a) Is adjudicated of an A+ or A++ offense;(b) Is fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or more of the following offenses:(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit a class A offense;(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060);(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070); or(iv) Violation of the uniform controlled substances act (RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) and (b)), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;(c) Is ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under RCW 13.40.193;(d) Is adjudicated of a))an offense under RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v), a child molestation in the first degree offense under RCW 9A.44.083, a hit and run resulting in death offense under RCW 46.52.020(4)(a), a rape of a child in the second degree offense under RCW 9A.44.076, a rape in the second or third degree offense under RCW 9A.44.050 or 9A.44.060, or a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030((; or(e) Has a prior option B disposition)).(4) The court may revoke a suspended disposition only if the court makes a finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c). A revocation of a suspended disposition is appealable under RCW 13.40.230.OROPTION CCHEMICAL DEPENDENCY/MENTAL HEALTH DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE((If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed a B++ or B+ offense))Unless a juvenile has been adjudicated of a child molestation in the first degree offense under RCW 9A.44.083 or a hit and run resulting in death offense under RCW 46.52.020(4)(a) or a rape of a child in the second degree offense under RCW 9A.44.076 or a rape in the second or third degree offense under RCW 9A.44.050 or 9A.44.060 or an offense under RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v), the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165. The court may revoke this disposition alternative only if the court makes a finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c).OROPTION DMANIFEST INJUSTICEIf the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).Sec. 5. RCW 72.05.420 and 1998 c 269 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall not initially place an offender in a community facility unless((:(a) The))the department has conducted a risk assessment, including a determination of drug and alcohol abuse, and the results indicate the juvenile will pose not more than a minimum risk to public safety((; and(b) The offender has spent at least ten percent of his or her sentence, but in no event less than thirty days, in a secure institution operated by, or under contract with, the department)).The risk assessment must include consideration of all prior convictions and all available nonconviction data released upon request under RCW 10.97.050, and any serious infractions or serious violations while under the jurisdiction of the secretary or the courts.(2) ((No juvenile offender may be placed in a community facility until the juvenile's student records and information have been received and the department has reviewed them in conjunction with all other information used for risk assessment, security classification, and placement of the juvenile.(3))) A juvenile offender shall not be placed in a community facility until the department's risk assessment and security classification is complete ((and local law enforcement has been properly notified)).Sec. 6. RCW 13.40.210 and 2024 c 297 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile committed to its custody and prioritize setting the release date as soon as possible for juveniles who would serve less than 90 days under the supervision of the department. The release date shall be within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW 13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days prior to the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the department shall be tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has absented himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.(2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the state's juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes that in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one hundred five percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such specification, as specified by the department in rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to the governor. On certification by the governor that the recommended reductions are necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release those offenders who have served the greatest proportion of their sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular case at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is no responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to release the offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted release under the provisions of this subsection.(3)(a) Following the release of any juvenile under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may require the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be administered by the department in his or her community which shall last no longer than eighteen months, except that in the case of a juvenile sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW 9.94A.030 the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for offenders released under subsection (2) of this section and for offenders who receive a juvenile residential commitment sentence for theft of a motor vehicle, possession of a stolen motor vehicle, or taking a motor vehicle without permission 1. A juvenile adjudicated for unlawful possession of a firearm, possession of a stolen firearm, theft of a firearm, or drive-by shooting may participate in aggression replacement training, functional family therapy, or functional family parole aftercare if the juvenile meets eligibility requirements for these services. The decision to place an offender in an evidence-based parole program shall be based on an assessment by the department of the offender's risk for reoffending upon release and an assessment of the ongoing treatment needs of the juvenile. The department shall prioritize available parole resources to provide supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.(b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this goal shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon, and refrain from committing new offenses or violating any orders issued by the juvenile court pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW, and may require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training, or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii) submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix) refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified class of individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole officer to further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community restitution. Community restitution for the purpose of this section means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender. Community restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or through work crews.(c) The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection and shall also be required to comply with the following additional terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed by the community case manager related to participating in the intensive supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision program, the secretary may require day reporting.(d) After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be discharged from the department's supervision.(4)(a) The department may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which he or she would be entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall order one of the following which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting requirements; (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v) the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.(b) The secretary may modify parole and order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for up to twenty-four weeks if the offender was sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW 9A.44.128 and is known to have violated the terms of parole. Confinement beyond thirty days is intended to only be used for a small and limited number of sex offenders. It shall only be used when other graduated sanctions or interventions have not been effective or the behavior is so egregious it warrants the use of the higher level intervention and the violation: (i) Is a known pattern of behavior consistent with a previous sex offense that puts the youth at high risk for reoffending sexually; (ii) consists of sexual behavior that is determined to be predatory as defined in RCW 71.09.020; or (iii) requires a review under chapter 71.09 RCW, due to a recent overt act. The total number of days of confinement for violations of parole conditions during the parole period shall not exceed the number of days provided by the maximum sentence imposed by the disposition for the underlying offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.0357. The department shall not aggregate multiple parole violations that occur prior to the parole revocation hearing and impose consecutive twenty-four week periods of confinement for each parole violation. The department is authorized to engage in rule making pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement this subsection, including narrowly defining the behaviors that could lead to this higher level intervention.(c) If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the department shall modify the parole under (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state or any county.(5) A parole officer of the department of children, youth, and families shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under his or her supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer would be authorized to arrest the person.(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section.Sec. 7. RCW 13.40.215 and 2021 c 206 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or ((before))after transfer to a community residential facility or community transition services program, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of a juvenile found to have committed a serious violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, to the following:(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the juvenile will reside; and(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the juvenile will reside.(b)(((i))) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest practicable date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any other authorized leave or release, or ((before))after transfer to a community residential facility or community transition services program, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of an individual who is found to have committed a serious violent offense or a sex offense, is twenty-one years of age or younger, and has not received a high school diploma or its equivalent, to the designated recipient of the school where the juvenile ((either: (A) Was enrolled prior to incarceration or detention; or (B))) has expressed an intention to enroll following ((his or her))the juvenile's release. This notice must also include the restrictions described in subsection (5) of this section.(((ii) The community residential facility shall provide written notice of the offender's criminal history to the designated recipient of any school that the offender attends while residing at the community residential facility and to any employer that employs the offender while residing at the community residential facility.(iii) As used in this subsection, "designated recipient" means: (A) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (B) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (C) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.))(c) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific juvenile:(i) The victim of the offense for which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the juvenile in any court proceedings involving the offense; and(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available to the juvenile. The notice to the chief of police or the sheriff shall include the identity of the juvenile, the residence where the juvenile will reside, the identity of the person, if any, responsible for supervising the juvenile, and the time period of any authorized leave.(d) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply to emergency medical furloughs.(e) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.(2)(a) If a juvenile found to have committed a serious violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking escapes from a facility of the department, the secretary shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the juvenile resided immediately before the juvenile's arrest. If previously requested, the secretary shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the juvenile is recaptured, the secretary shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working days after the department learns of such recapture.(b) The secretary may authorize a leave, for a juvenile found to have committed a serious violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. Prior to the commencement of an emergency or medical leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will be during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave. If previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and victim of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the offense was a homicide.In case of an emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portion of the requirements for leaves pursuant to RCW 13.40.205 (2)(a), (3), (4), and (5).(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.(4) The secretary shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department with a current address.(5) Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or other authorized leave or release, a convicted juvenile sex offender shall not attend a public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school that is attended by a victim or a sibling of a victim of the sex offender. The parents or legal guardians of the convicted juvenile sex offender shall be responsible for transportation or other costs associated with or required by the sex offender's change in school that otherwise would be paid by a school district.(6) For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:(a) "((Violent))Serious violent offense" means a serious violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;(c) "Stalking" means the crime of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;(d) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children.Sec. 8. RCW 13.40.230 and 1997 c 338 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Dispositions reviewed pursuant to RCW 13.40.160 shall be reviewed in the appropriate division of the court of appeals.An appeal under this section shall be heard solely upon the record that was before the disposition court. No written briefs may be required, and the appeal shall be heard within thirty days following the date of sentencing and a decision rendered within fifteen days following the argument. The supreme court shall promulgate any necessary rules to effectuate the purposes of this section.(2) To uphold a disposition outside the standard range, the court of appeals must find: (a) ((that))That the reasons supplied by the disposition judge are supported by the record which was before the judge and that those reasons clearly and convincingly support the conclusion that a disposition within the range would constitute a manifest injustice((,)); and (b) that the sentence imposed was neither clearly excessive nor clearly too lenient.(3) If the court does not find subsection (2)(a) of this section it shall remand the case for disposition within the standard range.(4) If the court finds subsection (2)(a) of this section but not subsection (2)(b) of this section it shall remand the case with instructions for further proceedings consistent with the provisions of this chapter.(5) To uphold a finding under RCW 13.40.160(1)(c), the court of appeals must find: (a) That the reasons supplied by the disposition judge are supported by the record which was before the judge; and (b) that those reasons clearly and convincingly support the conclusion that commitment to the department is needed because a community-based placement would not adequately protect the community.(6) The disposition court may impose conditions on release pending appeal as provided in RCW 13.40.040(((4)))(5) and 13.40.050(6).(((6)))(7) Appeal of a disposition under this section does not affect the finality or appeal of the underlying adjudication of guilt.Sec. 9. RCW 72.01.412 and 2023 c 470 s 3018 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families under RCW 72.01.410 is eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department of children, youth, and families:(a) After the person's 25th birthday:(i) If the person's earned release date is after the person's 25th birthday but on or before the person's 26th birthday; and(ii) The department of children, youth, and families determines that placement in community transition services is in the best interests of the person and the community; or(b) After 60 percent of their term of confinement has been served, and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement served including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order if:(i) The person has an earned release date that is before their 26th birthday; and(ii) The department of children, youth, and families determines that such placement and retention by the department of children, youth, and families is in the best interests of the person and the community.(2) "Term of confinement" as used in subsection (1)(b) of this section means the term of confinement ordered, reduced by the total amount of earned time eligible for the offense.(3) The department's determination under subsection (1)(a)(ii) and (b)(ii) of this section must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations.(4) The department of children, youth, and families retains the authority to transfer the person to the custody of the department of corrections under RCW 72.01.410.(5) A person may only be placed in community transition services under this section for the remaining 18 months of their term of confinement.(6) A person placed in community transition services under this section must have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department of children, youth, and families, including but not limited to:(a) Behavioral health treatment;(b) Independent living;(c) Employment;(d) Education;(e) Connections to family and natural supports; and(f) Community connections.(7) If the person has a sentence that includes a term of community custody, this term of community custody must begin after the current term of confinement has ended.(8) If a person placed on community transition services under this section commits a violation requiring the return of the person to total confinement after the person's 25th birthday, the person must be transferred to the custody and supervision of the department of corrections for the remainder of the sentence.(9) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:(a) Persons with pending charges or warrants, except those who are charged with an offense that allegedly occurred at a juvenile rehabilitation institution;(b) Persons who will be transferred to the department of corrections, who are in the custody of the department of corrections, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections;(c) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;(d) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;(e) Level III sex offenders; and(f) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.(10) As used in this section, "community transition services" means a therapeutic and supportive community-based custody option in which:(a) A person serves a portion of his or her term of confinement residing in the community, outside of the department of children, youth, and families institutions and community facilities;(b) The department of children, youth, and families supervises the person in part through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored person's presence or absence at a particular location;(c) The department of children, youth, and families provides access to developmentally appropriate, trauma-informed, racial equity-based, and culturally relevant programs to promote successful reentry; and(d) The department of children, youth, and families prioritizes the delivery of available programming from individuals who share characteristics with the individual being served related to: Race; ethnicity; sexual identity; and gender identity.Sec. 10. RCW 13.40.205 and 2021 c 206 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A juvenile sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the supervision of the department shall not be released from the physical custody of the department prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210 except as otherwise provided in this section.(2) A juvenile serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department may be released on authorized leave from the physical custody of the department only if consistent with public safety and if:(a) Sixty percent of the minimum term of confinement has been served; and(b) The purpose of the leave is to enable the juvenile:(i) To visit the juvenile's family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving family relationships;(ii) To make plans for parole or release which require the juvenile's personal appearance in the community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into the community; or(iii) To make plans for a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which requires the juvenile's personal appearance in the community.(3) No authorized leave may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all preminimum term authorized leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final discharge from confinement shall not exceed thirty days.(4) Prior to authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan, which shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the address at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by such person acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to supervise the juvenile and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile violates any terms or conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include such terms and conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be signed by the juvenile.(5) Upon authorizing a leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an authorized leave order which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact that the juvenile is on leave from a designated facility, the time period of the leave, and the identity of an appropriate official of the department to contact when necessary. The authorized leave order shall be carried by the juvenile at all times while on leave.(6) Prior to the commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave.(7) The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the department. In cases of emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any portions of subsections (2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.(8) If requested by the juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the secretary shall give notice of any leave or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section to the victim or the victim's immediate family.(9) A juvenile who violates any condition of an authorized leave plan or community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may be taken into custody and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in identical circumstances.(10) Community transition services is an electronic monitoring program as that term is used in RCW 9A.76.130.(11) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum security status or in community transition services under subsection (13) of this section may participate in work, educational, community restitution, or treatment programs in the community up to twelve hours a day if approved by the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave of absence. This authorization may be increased to more than twelve hours a day up to sixteen hours a day if approved by the secretary and operated within the department's appropriations.(12) Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered by RCW 13.40.215.(13)(a) The department may require a person in its custody to serve the remainder of the person's sentence in community transition services if the department determines that such placement is in the best interest of the person and the community using the risk assessment tool and considering the availability of appropriate placements, treatment, and programming. The department's determination described under this subsection must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations. The department shall establish appropriate conditions the person must comply with to remain in community transition services. A person must have served 60 percent of their minimum term of confinement and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order before becoming eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department.(b) A person placed in community transition services under this section must have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department, including but not limited to:(i) Behavioral health treatment;(ii) Independent living;(iii) Employment;(iv) Education;(v) Connections to family and natural supports; and(vi) Community connections.(c) Community transition services under this section is in lieu of confinement in an institution or community facility operated by the department, and will not fulfill any period of parole required under RCW 13.40.210.(d) If a person placed in community transition services under this section violates a condition of participation in the community transition services program, or if the department determines that placement in the program is no longer in the best interests of the person or community, the person may be returned to an institution operated by the department at the department's discretion.(e) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:(i) Persons with pending charges or warrants, except those that are charged with an offense that allegedly occurred at a juvenile rehabilitation institution;(ii) Persons who will be transferred to the department of corrections, who are in the custody of the department of corrections, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections;(iii) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;(iv) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;(v) Level III sex offenders; and(vi) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.(14) The department shall design, or contract for the design, and implement a risk assessment tool. The tool must be designed to limit bias related to race, ethnicity, gender, and age. The risk assessment tool must be certified at least every three years based on current academic standards for assessment validation, and can be certified by the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability or an outside researcher.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---